North Carolina statutes. Chapter 31. Wills.
Article 2. Revocation of Will.

§ 31-5.
[Repealed]

Rewritten and renumbered as

G.S. 31-5.1

by Session Laws 1953, c. 1098, s. 3.

§ 31-5.1.
Revocation of written will.

A written will, or any part thereof, may be revoked only

By a subsequent written will or codicil or other revocatory writing executed in the manner provided herein for the execution of written wills, or

By being burnt, torn, canceled, obliterated, or destroyed, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it, by the testator himself or by another person in the testator’s presence and by the testator’s direction.

History.

1784, c. 204, s. 14; 1819, c. 1004, ss. 1, 2; 1840, c. 62; R.C., c. 119, s. 22; Code, s. 2176; Rev., s. 3115; C.S., s. 4133; 1945, c. 140; 1953, c. 1098, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the testator’s presence and by the testator’s direction” for “his presence and by his direction” in subdivision (2).

§ 31-5.2.
Revocation of nuncupative will.

A nuncupative will or any part thereof may be revoked

By a subsequent nuncupative will, or

By a subsequent written will or codicil or other revocatory writing executed in the manner provided herein for the execution of written wills.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 4.

§ 31-5.3.
Will not revoked by marriage; dissent from will made prior to marriage.

A will is not revoked by a subsequent marriage of the maker; and the surviving spouse may petition for an elective share when there is a will made prior to the marriage in the same manner, upon the same conditions, and to the same extent, as a surviving spouse may petition for an elective share when there is a will made subsequent to marriage.

History.

1844, c. 88, s. 10; R.C., c. 119, s. 23; Code, s. 2177; Rev., s. 3116; C.S., s. 4134; 1947, c. 110; 1953, c. 1098, s. 5; 1967, c. 128; 2000-178, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to right of elective share, see

G.S. 30-3.1

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1973 case law on the revocation of wills by subsequent marriage, see 52 N.C.L. Rev. 949 (1974).

§ 31-5.4.
Revocation by divorce or annulment; revival.

Dissolution of marriage by absolute divorce or annulment after making a will does not revoke the will of any testator but, unless otherwise specifically provided in the will, it revokes all provisions in the will in favor of the testator’s former spouse or purported former spouse, including, but not by way of limitation, any provision conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former spouse or purported former spouse and any appointment of the former spouse or purported former spouse as executor, trustee, conservator, or guardian. If provisions are revoked solely by this section, they are revived by the testator’s remarriage to the former spouse or purported former spouse.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 6; 1977, c. 74, s. 3; 1991, c. 587, s. 1.

§ 31-5.5.
After-born or after-adopted child; children born out of wedlock; effect on will.

A will shall not be revoked by the subsequent birth of a child to the testator, or by the subsequent adoption of a child by the testator, or by the subsequent entitlement of an after-born child born out of wedlock to take as an heir of the testator pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 29-19(b), but any after-born, after-adopted or entitled after-born child born out of wedlock shall have the right to share in the testator’s estate to the same extent the after-born, after-adopted, or entitled after-born child born out of wedlock would have shared if the testator had died intestate unless:

The testator made some provision in the will for the child, whether adequate or not;

It is apparent from the will itself that the testator intentionally did not make specific provision therein for the child;

The testator had children living when the will was executed, and none of the testator’s children actually take under the will;

The surviving spouse receives all of the estate under the will; or

The testator made provision for the child that takes effect upon the death of the testator, whether adequate or not.

The provisions of

G.S. 28A-22-2

shall be construed as being applicable to after-adopted children and to after-born children, whether legitimate or entitled children born out of wedlock.

The terms “after-born,” “after-adopted” and “entitled after-born” as used in this section refer to children born, adopted or entitled subsequent to the execution of the will.

History.

1868-9, c. 113, s. 62; Code, s. 2145; Rev., s. 3145; C.S., s. 4169; 1953, c. 1098, s. 7; 1955, c. 541; 1973, c. 1062, s. 2; 1985, c. 689, s. 9; 1995, c. 161, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 55.8; 2011-344, s. 8; 2013-198, s. 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the after-born, after adopted, or entitled after-born illegitimate child would have shared” for “he would have shared” near the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-198, s. 14, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “children born out of wedlock” for “illegitimate child” in the section heading; substituted “child born out of wedlock” for “illegitimate child” throughout subsection (a); and substituted “children born out of wedlock” for “illegitimate” at the end of subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on sufficiency of life insurance as provision for after-born child, see 29 N.C.L. Rev. 218 (1951).

For note on the inheritance rights of an after-adopted child, see 30 N.C.L. Rev. 276 (1952).

For article on interstate and foreign adoptions in North Carolina, see 40 N.C.L. Rev. 691 (1962).

For casenote: “The Established Standard for Fathers Who Have Acknowledged Paternity and Who Are Seeking Custody of Their Illegitimate Child(ren): Rosero v. Blake,

357 N.C. 193

(2003),” see 26 N.C. Cent. L.J. 116 (2003).

§ 31-5.6.
No revocation by subsequent conveyance.

No conveyance or other act made or done subsequently to the execution of a will of, or relating to, any real or personal estate therein comprised, except an act by which such will shall be duly revoked, shall prevent the operation of the will with respect to any estate or interest in such real or personal estate as the testator shall have power to dispose of by will at the time of the testator’s death.

History.

1844, c. 88, s. 2; R.C. c. 119, s. 25; Code, s. 2179; Rev., s. 3118; C.S., s. 4136; 1953, c. 1098, s. 8; 2011-344, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the testator’s death” for “his death” at the end.

Legal Periodicals.

For article discussing the North Carolina Supreme Court’s interpretation of this section, see 19 Wake Forest L. Rev. 151 (1983).

§ 31-5.7.
Specific provisions for revocation exclusive; effect of changes in circumstances.

No will can be revoked in whole or in part by any act of the testator or by a change in the testator’s circumstances or condition except as provided by

G.S. 31-5.1

through 31-5.6 inclusive.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 9; 2011-344, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the testator’s circumstances” for “his circumstances.”

§ 31-5.8.
Revival of revoked will.

No will or any part thereof that has been in any manner revoked can, except as provided in

G.S. 31-5.4

, be revived otherwise than by a reexecution thereof, or by the execution of another will in which the revoked will or part thereof is incorporated by reference.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 10; 1991, c. 587, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1973 case law on the revocation of wills by subsequent marriage, see 52 N.C.L. Rev. 949 (1974).

§ 31-6.
[Repealed]

Renumbered as

G.S. 31-5.3

by Session Laws 1953, c. 1098, s. 5.

§ 31-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1953, c. 1098, s. 9.

§ 31-8.
[Repealed]

Renumbered as

G.S. 31-5.6

by Session Laws 1953, c. 1098, s. 8.